Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Compensation

4-7-201. Annual compensation survey.

The commissioner of human resources shall annually conduct a survey of the then current compensation levels of the duty classifications and classes of position in §4-7-203 in the following adjacent states — Kentucky, Virginia, North Carolina, Georgia, Alabama, Mississippi, Arkansas and Missouri — for the purpose of implementing a revised salary schedule for such duty classifications and classes of position.

Acts 1986, ch. 935, § 1; 2007, ch. 60, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3 provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

4-7-202. Report of survey.

The commissioner of human resources is directed to annually report on or before September 1, the data and conclusions of the compensation survey to the commissioner of safety, the commissioner of finance and administration, the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives and the office of legislative budget analysis.

Acts 1986, ch. 935, § 2; 2007, ch. 60, § 3; 2010, ch. 1030, § 4.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (b), concerning implementation of the initial compensation survey, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 1991.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3 provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

4-7-203. Corresponding duty classifications and compensation in adjacent states.

The commissioner of human resources shall determine corresponding duty classifications of highway patrol officers or other state officers of the adjacent states who perform the same or similar duties as fully commissioned members employed by the department of safety, and electronic alarms technicians of the division of motor vehicle enforcement. The commissioner shall utilize the duty classifications of such members of the department of safety that were in use on January 1, 1985, to determine the classification and compensation of such members.

This part shall apply to the following members of the department of safety:

Commissioned members of the highway patrol;

Commissioned members of the division of motor vehicle enforcement; and

Electronic alarms technicians of the division of motor vehicle enforcement.

This part shall apply to the commissioned members of the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee law enforcement training academy.

The compensation report shall determine the compensation levels of highway patrol officers or other state officers of the adjacent states who have attained the same or similar class of position, for each of the duty classifications, as the classes of position that were in use on January 1, 1985, to determine the classification and compensation of such members of the department of safety.

Impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 93, § 1; Acts 1986, ch. 935, § 3; 2006, ch. 1009, §§ 2, 3; 2007, ch. 60, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3 provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

4-7-204. Establishment of compensation schedule.

(1) The survey shall determine the lowest step in the range in each adjacent state for each class of position in each duty classification, and from such data determine the average compensation paid in the adjacent states for each class of position in each duty classification.

The survey shall establish a ten-step range in each class of position in each duty classification. The amount of average compensation as determined in this section shall equal Step 1 of each class of position in each duty classification.

Step 2 of each class of position in each duty classification shall equal one hundred four and one-half percent (104.5%) of Step 1.

Step 3 of each class of position in each duty classification shall equal one hundred nine and two-tenths percent (109.2%) of Step 1.

Step 4 of each class of position in each duty classification shall equal one hundred fourteen and twelve hundredths percent (114.12%) of Step 1.

Step 5 of each class of position in each duty classification shall equal one hundred nineteen and one-quarter percent (119.25%) of Step 1.

Step 6 of each class of position in each duty classification shall equal one hundred twenty-four and sixty-two hundredths percent (124.62%) of Step 1.

Step 7 of each class of position in each duty classification shall equal one hundred thirty and twenty-three hundredths percent (130.23%) of Step 1.

Step 8 of each class of position in each duty classification shall equal one hundred thirty-six and nine hundredths percent (136.09%) of Step 1.

Step 9 of each class of position in each duty classification shall equal one hundred forty-two and twenty-one hundredths percent (142.21%) of Step 1.

Step 10 of each class of position in each duty classification shall equal one hundred forty-eight and sixty-one hundredths percent (148.61%) of Step 1.

(1) In determining the compensation paid in each adjacent state for each class of position in each duty classification, the survey shall not include any employment benefits other than direct compensation, and shall not include any longevity pay unless such pay is a normal part of the monthly base pay schedule.

In determining the compensation paid in each adjacent state for each class of position for the duty classifications within the division of motor vehicle enforcement, the survey shall not include any personnel from an adjacent state who are not commissioned members of a state organization, regardless of any similarity of duties, and shall not include any personnel from an adjacent state who are commissioned members of a state police or highway patrol organization.

Acts 1986, ch. 935, § 4; 1987, ch. 245, § 1.

4-7-205. Implementation of salary schedule.

The salary schedule determined by the most recent compensation survey shall be implemented by the commissioners of human resources and finance and administration in the next fiscal year, subject only to availability of appropriations.

In each fiscal year all funds appropriated in the general appropriations act and allocated for the salaries of fully commissioned members of the department of safety and electronic alarms technicians of the division of motor vehicle enforcement shall be first used to implement the compensation survey. To the extent of any remaining funds, the general assembly, upon the recommendations of the department of human resources, shall provide for the expenditure of such funds.

No adjustment arising from the survey provided for in this part or the salary schedule determined by the survey shall take effect until such adjustment is funded in the general appropriations bill.

The payment of such adjustment or increase in the salary schedule is conditioned upon such adjustment or increase being funded in the general appropriations bill.

Acts 1986, ch. 935, § 5; 1987, ch. 245, § 2; 2007, ch. 60, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3 provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

4-7-206. Duty classifications for initial implementation.

For implementation purposes in the initial fiscal year of the compensation survey, the fully commissioned members of each duty classification in the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee law enforcement training academy shall be paid in accordance with the following schedule for the proper class of position:

Newly hired members and those with less than one (1) year service in like class of position shall be at Step 1;

Members with more than one (1) year but less than two (2) years' service in like class of position shall be at Step 2;

Members with more than two (2) years' but less than three (3) years' service in like class of position shall be at Step 3;

Members with more than three (3) years' but less than four (4) years' service in like class of position shall be at Step 4;

Members with more than four (4) years' but less than five (5) years' service in like class of position shall be at Step 5;

Members with more than five (5) years' but less than six (6) years' service in like class of position shall be at Step 6;

Members with more than six (6) years' but less than seven (7) years' service in like class of position shall be at Step 7;

Members with more than seven (7) years' but less than eight (8) years' service in like class of position shall be at Step 8;

Members with more than eight (8) years' but less than nine (9) years' service in like class of position shall be at Step 9; and

Members with more than nine (9) years' service in like class of position shall be at Step 10.

For implementation purposes in the initial fiscal year of the compensation survey, the fully commissioned members of each duty classification in the department of safety, and electronic alarms technicians of the division of motor vehicle enforcement, except members of the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee law enforcement training academy, shall be paid in accordance with each member's present step in class of position as of June 30, 1986, and each such member shall receive one (1) additional step in class of position on July 1, 1986, not to exceed ten (10) steps.

For implementation purposes in each subsequent fiscal year of the compensation survey, all fully commissioned members of each duty classification in the department of safety, and electronic alarms technicians of the division of motor vehicle enforcement shall receive one (1) additional step in class of position on each July 1, not to exceed ten (10) steps.

For implementation purposes in each fiscal year of the compensation survey, the following duty classifications shall be paid the same as the duty classification deemed its equivalent, for like years of service:

A technician 3 in the highway patrol shall be equivalent to a sergeant in the highway patrol;

A technician supervisor in the highway patrol shall be equivalent to a lieutenant in the highway patrol; and

An electronic alarms technician in the division of motor vehicle enforcement shall be equivalent to a sergeant in the division of motor vehicle enforcement.

For implementation purposes in each fiscal year of the compensation survey, for fully commissioned members of the department of safety, and communications technicians of the department of safety, any length of service in the highway patrol at a comparable or a higher rank, any length of service in the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee law enforcement training academy at the same or a higher rank and any length of service in the division of motor vehicle enforcement at the same or a higher rank shall be included in computing a member's years of service.

Impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 93, § 1; Acts 1986, ch. 935, § 6; 1987, ch. 375, § 1.

4-7-207. Promotions.

Any promotion to a higher class of position shall result in a minimum increase of compensation of at least five percent (5%), notwithstanding §4-7-206.

Acts 1986, ch. 935, § 7.

4-7-208. Determination of compensation for each step.

For implementation purposes of the compensation survey in fiscal year 1988-1989, and in all subsequent fiscal years, the average compensation for each class of position in each duty classification shall be determined in accordance with §4-7-204(a)(1). All other steps shall be computed in accordance with §4-7-204(a).

Acts 1986, ch. 935, § 10.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsections (a) and (b), concerning implementation of compensation surveys in fiscal years prior to 1988, were deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 1991.

4-7-209. Suspension of step schedules.

Implementation of salary increases pursuant to this part based on step schedules shall be suspended for the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2003, and ending June 30, 2004, and beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2010. In the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2004, and July 1, 2010, and in subsequent fiscal years, salary increases pursuant to this part based on step schedules shall not include time of service between July 1, 2003, and June 30, 2004, nor between July 1, 2009, and June 30, 2010.

The salary increase provided by this part and suspended by subsection (a) for the period July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2004, shall be reinstated effective July 1, 2017. For purposes of determining the appropriate salary classification pursuant to this part, credible service for the time period of July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2004, shall be included.

Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 2; 2009, ch. 531, § 20; 2017, ch. 461, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.